District of Columbia statutes.
7-141

Exemption for persons relying on spiritual means to cure disease.

With respect to all persons who, either on behalf of themselves or their minor children or wards, rely in good faith upon spiritual means or prayer in the free exercise of religion to prevent or cure disease, nothing in this subchapter or any rule or regulation issued pursuant to this subchapter shall have the effect of requiring or giving any health officer or other person the right to compel any such person, minor child or ward, to go to or be confined in a hospital or other medical institution unless no other place for quarantine of such person, minor child or ward can be secured, nor to compel any such person, child or ward to submit to any medical treatment.

Aug. 11, 1939, ch. 601, § 11
Aug. 8, 1946, 60 Stat. 922, ch. 871, § 2
Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-83, § 3(g), 32 DCR 7276
1981 Ed., § 6-127.
1973 Ed., § 6-119i.